California statutes. Public Resources Code
(7) If the property owner or tenant is unable to provide the necessary access to perform baseline or followup testing under this section, then failure to do the testing is not a violation of this section. The division may waive the requirements of this section if the operator demonstrates that the delay in well work associated with the requirements of this section is likely to result in significant damage to life, health, or natural resources. The operator is not required to sample or test water under this section if the
 relevant authorities have determined that the water is not an underground source of drinking water, as defined in the federal Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300f et. seq.), and the water has no beneficial uses, in accordance with subdivision (f) of Section 13050 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 365, Sec. 2.   (SB 1137)   Effective date (January 1, 2023) suspended pursuant to referendum petition.  Effective June 27, 2024, pursuant to withdrawal of referendum measure.)
-------------------------------------------

3285.

(a) Every operator shall submit to the division by July 1, 2025, a sensitive receptor inventory and map that includes the following:

(1) A list of all sensitive receptors within 3,200 feet of an operator’s wellheads and production facilities by field. For each sensitive receptor listed, the operator shall provide all of the following:

(A) The distance from the sensitive receptor to each wellhead or production facility that is located within 3,200 feet of that specific receptor. The well shall be
 identified by API number, and the production facility shall also be explicitly identified. Latitude and longitude shall also be provided for the wellhead and production facility.

(B) The type of sensitive receptor.

(C) A map showing each sensitive receptor’s location in relation to the operator’s wellheads and production facilities.

(2) A statement from each operator based on their sensitive receptor inventory that provides the operator’s determination as to whether their wellheads and production facilities are located within 3,200 feet of a sensitive receptor. An operator who has identified sufficient sensitive receptors such that their entire operation is located within a health protection zone may cease adding new sensitive receptors to their inventory and make a determination that all of their wellheads and
 production facilities are located within a health protection zone.

(b) By July 1 of each year, all operators shall submit to the division a sensitive receptor inventory and map pursuant to subdivision (a) that is up to date, with information no more than 90 days old, and shall make a new determination regarding the location of each of their wellheads and production facilities within a health protection zone. If there have been no changes to the location of sensitive receptors in the 3,200 feet surrounding the operator’s wellheads and production facilities, the operator shall submit a statement that no changes to the determination are needed.

(c) The division shall review for completeness and accuracy no less than 30 percent of the inventories and associated maps submitted annually pursuant to this section. The division shall notify operators of any discrepancies in the submitted
 inventories and maps as determined by the division.

(d) The division shall make available to the public on its internet website all current sensitive receptor inventories and maps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1002, Sec. 3.   (AB 218)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3286.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2030, and no less than annually on a date to be determined by the division, an operator with a wellhead or other production facility or facilities in a health protection zone shall provide at least the following information to the division by location in a format that complies with all requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101–336) and its implementing regulations for online viewing:

(1) The number of and amounts of time the emissions detection system was not operating.

(2) The number of validated alarms, and the reasons for the alarms.

(3) The number of leaks that occurred, the time needed to repair the leak, and a brief description of the leak, including the impact on air quality and community exposure.

(4) The number of times the surrounding community was notified after a leak persisted for 48 hours.

(5) The number of times and length of time production and injection operations and other use of the facility were suspended due to leaks.

(6) Any baseline and postdrilling groundwater testing performed by location.

(b) The division shall make the information submitted by the operators available
 to the public on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1002, Sec. 4.   (AB 218)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3287.

Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before July 1, 2030, and annually thereafter, the division shall provide a legislative report to the applicable budget and policy committees regarding the implementation of health protection zones by the division. The reports shall include at least the following:

(a) The number and types of wells and attendant facilities in health protection zones by operator and field.

(b) The estimated population protected by the health protection zone.

(c) The status of leak detection and response plans by operation and location.

(d) The number and type of notices of intention approved in health protection zones and the reason the notices of intention received approval by operator and field.

(e) The number of sensitive receptor inventories and maps received by the division by operator and field.

(f) Aggregated information by operator and location of leaks detected and alarms associated with the leaks.

(g) The number of notices of violation issued by the division for dust control, excess noise and light, and other requirements pursuant to this article by operator and field.

(h) The number of orders issued by the supervisor pursuant to this article by operator and field.

(i) The number of times by operator and location that baseline and postdrilling groundwater testing was performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1002, Sec. 5.   (AB 218)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3288.

The division, the State Air Resources Board, and the State Water Resources Control Board may prescribe, adopt, and enforce any emergency regulations as necessary to implement, administer, and enforce its duties under this article. Any emergency regulation prescribed, adopted, or enforced pursuant to this article shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding any other law, the emergency regulations adopted by the division, the State Air Resources
 Board, and the State Water Resources Control Board may remain in effect for two years from adoption, or until July 1, 2026, whichever date is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1002, Sec. 6.   (AB 218)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3289.

(a) No provision of this article is a limitation on the authority or jurisdiction of the State Water Resources Control Board, the regional water quality control boards, the State Air Resources Board, or local air quality districts.

(b) This article does not prohibit a city, county, or city and county from imposing more stringent regulations, limits, or prohibitions on oil and gas development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 365, Sec. 2.   (SB 1137)   Effective date (January 1, 2023) suspended pursuant to referendum petition.  Effective June 27, 2024, pursuant to withdrawal of referendum measure.)
-------------------------------------------

3290.

The State Air Resources Board, relevant local air districts, the State Water Resources Control Board, and relevant local water quality control boards shall enter into memoranda of understanding with the division to clearly delineate respective responsibilities for implementing and enforcing health protection zones. These memoranda of understanding shall be executed by June 1, 2025. The division may pursue additional memoranda of understanding with other state and local entities as needed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1002, Sec. 7.   (AB 218)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3291.

This article does not diminish or alter the authority of the supervisor to deny, revoke, or suspend permits to meet the division’s purpose to protect public health and safety and environmental quality, including the reduction and mitigation of greenhouse gas emissions, or the supervisor’s repeated obligation pursuant to this division to supervise certain oil and gas related operations to prevent, as far as possible, damage to life, health, property, natural resources, or underground and surface waters suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes, among other reasons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 365, Sec. 2.   (SB 1137)   Effective date (January 1, 2023) suspended pursuant to referendum petition.  Effective June 27, 2024, pursuant to withdrawal of referendum measure.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Unreasonable Waste of Gas [3300. - 3314.]

3300.

The unreasonable waste of natural gas by the act, omission, sufferance, or insistence of the lessor, lessee or operator of any land containing oil or gas, or both, whether before or after the removal of gasoline from the gas, is opposed to the public interest and is unlawful. The blowing, release, or escape of gas into the air shall be prima facie evidence of unreasonable waste.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3301.

Whenever the supervisor finds that it is in the interest of the protection of oil or gas from unreasonable waste, the lessors, lessees, operators or other persons owning or controlling royalty or other interests in the separate properties of the same producing or prospective oil or gas field, may, with the approval of the supervisor, enter into agreements for the purpose of bringing about the cooperative development and operation of all or a part or parts of the field, or for the purpose of bringing about the development or operation of all or a part or parts of such field as a unit, or for the purpose of fixing the time, location, and manner of drilling and operating of wells for the production of oil or gas, or providing for the return of gas into the sub-surface of the earth for the purpose of storage or the repressuring of an oil or gas field. Any such agreement shall bind the successors and assigns of the parties thereto in the land affected thereby and shall be enforceable in an action for specific performance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3302.

Upon complaint being made to the director by any person operating in any oil field that there is occurring or threatened an unreasonable waste of gas in any field or fields, and when a petition is filed with the director requesting that a hearing be held to consider whether such waste is occurring or threatened, if it appears to the director that there is probable cause for such complaint, he shall order the supervisor to hold such a hearing and to fix a time and place therefor. A hearing may also be ordered by the director on the application of the supervisor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3303.

Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given by publication in a newspaper printed and published in the county in which the unreasonable waste of gas is alleged to be taking place or to be threatened. The notice shall specify the commonly accepted name or a general description of the field or locality. Publication shall be daily for five days prior to the time of the hearing. The supervisor shall also send notice by mail to each lessor, lessee, or operator, known to him, of any well in the field. Failure to send such written notice shall not affect the validity of the proceeding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3304.

The place of hearing shall be in the county or in any of the counties in which the unreasonable waste of gas is alleged to be taking place or to be threatened.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3305.

At the hearing all persons interested are entitled to be heard and may present testimony either oral or written. All witnesses shall be sworn, and a transcript of the proceedings shall be kept by a stenographic reporter. All the provisions of this chapter in reference to the subpoenaing of witnesses and the taking of depositions are applicable to the hearing before the supervisor. On the request of the supervisor, a hearing officer in the Office of Administrative Hearings may assist and rule upon legal matters, but such officer shall not make the determination specified in Section 3306.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 287.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3306.

Upon the conclusion of the hearing, the supervisor shall determine whether or not there is an unreasonable waste of gas in the field, in existence or threatened, and shall also determine the extent to which the waste of gas, occurring or threatened, is unreasonable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3307.

If it appears that gas is being produced from any oil well or wells in quantities exceeding a reasonable proportion to the amount of oil produced from the same well or wells, even though it is shown that such excess gas is being used in the generation of light, heat, power, or any other industrial purpose, the supervisor shall hold that such excess production of gas is unreasonable waste.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1670.)
-------------------------------------------

3308.

If the waste of gas is found to be unreasonable, an order shall be made by the supervisor directing that the unreasonable waste of gas be discontinued or refrained from to the extent stated in the order. The sale or delivery of gas to another by a lessor, lessee, or operator shall be no defense, excuse, or reason for any lessor, lessee, or operator disobeying an order of the supervisor directing the discontinuance or curtailment of the production of the well or wells from which gas is being produced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1670.)
-------------------------------------------

3309.

A copy of the supervisor’s order shall be posted in a conspicuous place upon the property affected, and the order shall become final 10 days after posting, unless it is appealed from as provided in Section 3350.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 741, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3310.

When the decision of the supervisor that there is an unreasonable waste of gas occurring or threatened has become final, a certified copy thereof shall be filed with the director. The director, unless the order is complied with voluntarily, shall have proceedings instituted in the name of the people of the State of California to enjoin the unreasonable waste of gas.

Such proceedings shall be instituted in the superior court of the county in which is situated the property, or any part thereof, where the wastage is occurring or is threatened. Any number of defendants may be joined in the same proceeding, although their properties and interests may be severally owned and their actual or threatened unreasonable wastage of gas may be separate and distinct, if the actual or threatened unreasonable waste by all of the defendants is in, or with reference to, the same producing or prospective oil or gas field.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 765.)
-------------------------------------------

3311.

In those suits, a restraining order shall not be issued ex parte, and a temporary or permanent injunction issued in the proceedings shall not be refused or dissolved or stayed pending appeal upon the giving of any bond or undertaking or otherwise, but otherwise the procedure, including the procedure on appeal, shall be conformable with the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

In the proceedings, the findings of the supervisor, unless set aside, or except to the extent modified, by the director, shall constitute prima facie evidence of the unreasonable wastage of gas therein found to be occurring or threatened.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 345.)
-------------------------------------------

3312.

Whenever it appears to the director that the owners, lessors, lessees, or operators of any well or wells producing oil and gas or oil or gas are causing or permitting an unreasonable waste of gas, he may institute, or have proceedings instituted, in the name of the people of the State of California, to enjoin the unreasonable waste of gas regardless of whether proceedings have or have not been instituted under sections 3302 to 3305, and regardless of whether an order has or has not been made therein.

Such proceedings shall be instituted in the superior court of the county in which is situated the well or wells, or any thereof, from which the unreasonable waste of gas is occurring. The owners, lessors, lessees, or operators causing or permitting an unreasonable waste of gas in the same oil or gas field may be made parties to the action, although their properties and interests may be separately owned and their unreasonable waste separate and distinct.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3313.

In such suits a restraining order shall not be issued ex parte, and a temporary or permanent injunction issued in such proceedings shall not be refused or dissolved or stayed pending appeal upon the giving of any bond or undertaking or otherwise, but otherwise the procedure shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter III of Title VII of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3314.

Proceedings to enjoin waste as contemplated by this chapter shall be special proceedings restricted to the single issue whether gas is being produced or is threatened to be produced in unreasonably wasteful quantities and the extent to which such production should be enjoined on behalf of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1670.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Subsidence [3315. - 3347.]

3315.

It is hereby found and determined:

(a) That the people of the State of California have a direct and primary interest in arresting and ameliorating the subsidence and compaction of land in those areas overlying or immediately adjacent to producing oil or gas pools within the State where valuable buildings, harbor installations and other improvements are being injured or imperiled or where subsidence is interfering or may interfere with commerce, navigation and fishery, or where substantial portions of such areas may be inundated if subsidence continues, thereby endangering life, health, safety, public peace, welfare and property;

(b) That in certain of such areas of the State land already has subsided to a great extent and is continuing to subside at an alarming rate, resulting in injury to surface and underground improvements through land movement or the threat of inundation from the sea, necessitating extensive filling and construction of levees and dikes; and requiring the raising, repair and reconstruction of highways, bridges, buildings, utility and transportation facilities, vital national defense installations and other improvements;

(c) That the results of studies by qualified engineers, which have been conducted in certain of such affected areas, indicate that the only feasible method that can be expected to arrest or ameliorate subsidence in such areas is by repressuring subsurface oil and gas formations thereunder and that such repressuring operations, in addition thereto, should increase the amount of oil ultimately recoverable from the formations underlying such areas and protect the oil or gas in such lands from unreasonable waste;

(d) That unit or co-operative operation of such pool or pools in such areas is necessary in order to repressure or maintain pressure in said pool or pools in order to arrest or ameliorate subsidence;

(e) That, in view of the special characteristics of the subsidence problem in such areas, it is necessary, therefore, that the State of California, through authority vested in the State Oil and Gas Supervisor, exercise its power and jurisdiction to require the carrying on of repressuring operations which will tend to arrest or ameliorate subsidence by maintaining or replenishing underground pressures in formations underlying such areas, thereby safeguarding life, health, property, and the public welfare, and to require such co-operative or unit plan or plans as may be necessary for repressuring which tend to arrest or ameliorate subsidence subject to the limitations on the authority of the supervisor contained in this article;

(f) That it is also desirable to encourage the carrying on of voluntary repressuring operations pursuant to voluntary unit or co-operative agreements in order to arrest or ameliorate subsidence, and as a means to that end it is necessary that the power of eminent domain be exercised to acquire the properties of nonconsenting owners of interests in oil and gas under the circumstances and subject to the limitations set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the general provisions and definitions contained in this chapter govern the construction of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.1.

As used in this article, “person” means any natural person, corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary or other representative of any kind and includes the state and any city, county, city and county, district or any department, agency or instrumentality of the state or of any governmental subdivision whatsoever.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 204.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.2.

“Pool” means an underground reservoir containing, or appearing at the time of determination to contain, a common accumulation of crude petroleum oil or natural gas or both. Each zone of a general structure which is separated from any other zone in the structure is a separate pool.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.3.

“Field” means the same general surface area which is underlaid or reasonably appears to be underlaid by one or more pools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.4.

“Repressuring operations” means gas injection operations, water injection operations, water flooding operations, or any combination thereof, or any other operations intended primarily to arrest or ameliorate subsidence, or to restore or increase the pressure in a pool, or to avoid or minimize a reduction of pressure within a pool.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.5.

“Subsidence” means sinking, lowering, collapsing, compaction or other movement of the land whether covered by water or not.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.6.

“Unit area” means all or part of a pool or pools included within the area embraced by a unit created pursuant to an order of the supervisor as provided in Section 3322, or created by a unit agreement voluntarily entered into.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.7.

“Unit production” means all oil, gas and other hydrocarbon substances produced from a unit area from the effective date of the order of the supervisor creating the unit, or from the effective date of a unit agreement approved by the supervisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.8.

“Fieldwide repressuring plan” means a plan based upon a competent engineering study or studies, prepared by a petroleum engineer licensed by the State, of all the pools in a field, designed so as to provide for a program of pressure restoration or maintenance as to most effectively arrest or ameliorate subsidence with respect to those land areas referred to in Section 3315.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.9.

“Unit agreement” means and includes, in addition to the unit agreement, any unit operating agreement, consent agreement and other agreement entered into in connection with and supplemental to such unit agreement, but shall not include any preliminary agreement confined to effectuating any exchange of interests in tracts of land which the parties to such preliminary agreement may desire.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.10.

“Increased production” means that portion of the oil or gas produced from all wells bottomed within a unit area, or within any other area where the supervisor finds repressuring operations feasible, during any year over and above the oil or gas that would have been produced from all wells bottomed within the same area during the identical year at the projected rate of decline for the wells in the absence of repressuring operations conducted pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.11.

“Working interest” means an interest held in lands by virtue of fee title, including lands held in trust, a lease, operating agreement or otherwise, under which the owner of such interest has the right to drill for, develop and produce oil and gas. A working interest shall be deemed vested in the owner thereof even though his right to drill or produce may be delegated to an operator under a drilling and operating agreement, unit agreement, or other type of operating agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.12.

“Working interest owner” means a person owning a working interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.13.

“Royalty interest” means a right to or interest in oil and gas produced from any lands or in the proceeds of the first sale thereof other than a working interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.14.

“Royalty interest owner” means a person owning a royalty interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.15.

“Unit operator” means the person or persons designated by the unit agreement or in accordance with subdivisions (g) and (j) of Section 3322 as operator or operators of the unitized area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.16.

“Land” means both surface and mineral rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3317.

This article applies only to lands, referred to in Section 3315, overlying or immediately adjacent to a producing pool or pools, when such lands are subsiding, portions of which lands are subject to threat of inundation from the sea and which subsidence is endangering the life, health and safety of persons or which is damaging or is threatening to cause damage to, any surface or underground improvements located on such lands overlying or immediately adjacent to such pool or pools. The area within the exterior boundaries established pursuant to Section 3336 shall be known as a “subsidence area.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3318.

An order of the supervisor which involves tide or submerged lands which may have been granted to any city, county, or city and county, or district, shall prohibit any impairment of the public trust for commerce, navigation, or fisheries to which the granted lands are subject. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that compliance with any such order containing such prohibition will not impair the public trust for commerce, navigation, or fisheries to which the granted lands are subject, and that any acts or things done pursuant to the terms thereof or resulting therefrom are consistent with and not in violation of the terms and conditions of any such grant or of any trusts, restrictions, or conditions of appertaining thereto. No such order shall effect or result in, or be construed to effect or result in a revocation of or change in any trust pertaining to the granted lands, or in any grant, conveyance, alienation, or transfer of the granted lands, or any part thereof, to any other individual, firm, or corporation, even though such order provides for the pooling of oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances produced from the granted lands with oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances produced from other lands, or results in the migration of any oil, gas or other hydrocarbon substances between the granted lands and other lands. If any of the granted lands are contained in any unit created or approved by an order of the supervisor, and, when applicable, the State Lands Commission, then any trust, restrictions, or conditions pertaining to any production from the granted lands included within such a unit, or to any proceeds from such production, shall apply only to that part of the production or that part of the proceeds therefrom which is allocated to such city, county, or city and county or district on account of the granted lands under any such order, and shall not apply to any other production or the proceeds therefrom, whether or not the same may have been produced from the granted lands or other lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3319.

(a) The supervisor, upon the supervisor’s own motion, may, or shall, upon the application of any city, county, or city and county, any part of which is in a subsidence area, or any contractor or lessee for the production of oil or gas therefor, or any person having a working interest therein, who has submitted therewith an engineering report and plan for fieldwide repressuring operations in the pool or pools in a field in order to arrest or ameliorate subsidence therein, prepared by a petroleum engineer licensed by the state, hold a public hearing. The public hearing shall, at a minimum, consider the need for repressuring operations in all of the pool or pools in order to arrest or ameliorate subsidence. The supervisor may order applications relating to the same field to be consolidated for the public hearing thereon.

(b) Before any application shall be considered, each applicant shall pay to the supervisor for deposit in the General Fund a sum of money estimated by the supervisor to be equivalent to the amount of costs necessary to publish and mail notices, to employ stenographic reporters, to prepare a daily transcript of such hearing for use by the supervisor, to pay any rental that may be necessary to provide quarters for the hearing and to reimburse the Department of Conservation for any charges imposed upon it for the services of a hearing officer or members of the Attorney General’s staff in conjunction with the hearing. If more than one application is filed, the costs shall be equally charged and assessed to and paid by the respective applicants. The costs, when finally determined, if in excess of the amount theretofore deposited shall be paid equally by the applicant or applicants. Any money remaining on deposit after final determination and payment of costs shall be refunded to the applicant or applicants equally. If, after a public hearing and from the evidence adduced therefrom, and from such engineering studies as the supervisor may have ordered made and which have been presented and considered at the hearing, the supervisor finds that repressuring operations of the pool or pools will tend to arrest or ameliorate subsidence, the supervisor shall by order adopt a fieldwide repressuring plan and specifications of the work to be done thereunder, if, in the judgment of the supervisor, the fieldwide plan and specifications are necessary, and will not substantially reduce the maximum economic quantity of oil or gas ultimately recoverable from the pool or pools under prudent and proper operations.

(c) Any fieldwide repressuring plan and general specifications shall be based upon a competent engineering study of all the pools in the field and shall provide for repressuring operations designed to most effectively arrest or ameliorate subsidence with respect to those land areas overlying or immediately adjacent to a producing pool or pools. The plan and specifications may provide that they may be carried out by one or more units made up of the pool, groups of pools, or portions thereof, or by individual persons, or by cooperative agreements between two or more persons or by any combinations of the foregoing which in the judgment of the supervisor shall be feasible. The study may be reviewed from time to time by the supervisor, and if it be determined, from an analysis of the collected data, that consideration should be given to the alteration or modification of the plan and specifications, the supervisor shall order the holding of the requisite hearing for the purpose of determining whether the change should be incorporated into the plan and specifications by an amended order. The supervisor may amend a fieldwide repressuring plan and general specifications of the work to be done in the same manner as herein provided for the initial adoption of the plan and specifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 999, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3319.1.

Prior to the adoption of a fieldwide repressuring plan and general specifications of the work to be done thereunder, as provided in Section 3319, the supervisor, upon the application of any city, county, city and county, any part of which is in a subsidence area, or any contractor or lessee for the production of oil or gas therefor, or any person having a working interest therein, who has submitted therewith an engineering report and plan for pressure restoration or pressure maintenance of a particular pool or pools, or portion thereof underlying a certain described area or portion of such field, designed for the purpose of arresting or ameliorating subsidence therein, prepared by a petroleum engineer licensed by the State, shall hold a public hearing to consider the need for repressuring operations in such pool or pools, or portion thereof, in order to arrest or ameliorate subsidence. Applications relating generally to the same described area or portions of such field may be ordered consolidated by the supervisor for such public hearing thereon.

The procedure and method prescribed in Section 3319, with reference to the determination of amount, assessment, payment and refunding of costs, in conjunction with the holding of the hearing therein provided, are hereby incorporated with reference to the determination of amount, assessment, payment and refunding of costs as a condition precedent to the holding of the hearing herein provided.

If, after a public hearing and from the evidence adduced therefrom, and from such engineering studies as he may have ordered made and which have been presented and considered at such hearing, the supervisor finds that repressuring operations of such pool or pools or portions thereof will tend to arrest or ameliorate subsidence, he shall by order adopt a repressuring plan and specifications of the work to be done thereunder in such pool or pools or portions thereof, if in his judgment such plan and specifications are necessary and will not substantially reduce the maximum economic quantity of oil or gas ultimately recoverable from such pool or pools under prudent and proper operations.

Any such repressuring plan and specifications adopted in furtherance thereof shall be designed to most effectively arrest or ameliorate subsidence with respect to those affected land areas overlying or immediately adjacent to such pool or pools, or portions thereof. The supervisor may amend such repressuring plan and specifications in the same manner as herein provided for the initial adoption of said repressuring plan and specifications.

Any order of the supervisor adopting a repressuring plan and specifications of the work to be done thereunder with respect to a particular pool, or pools, or portions thereof, shall be expressly conditioned so as to provide that such plan and specifications shall be subject to amendment or modification if, after the holding of a public hearing thereon, it be determined that such amendment or modification is necessary in order to conform such plan and specifications with the subsequently adopted fieldwide repressuring plan and general specifications as provided for in Section 3319.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3320.
